California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) (1) For purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part or any other law that is applicable to the mailing of any returns, payments, or any other items required to be filed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part, any reference in Section 11003 of the Government Code to the United States mail shall be treated as
 including a reference to any designated delivery service, and any reference in that section to a post office cancellation mark shall be treated as including a reference to any date recorded electronically by a designated delivery service, kept in the regular course of the designated delivery service’s business, or marks on the cover in which any item is to be delivered to the board that indicate the date on which the item was given to the designated delivery service for delivery.

(2) For purposes of this section, “designated delivery service” means any delivery service provided by a trade or business if that service is designated by the Secretary of the Treasury under the authority of Section 7502(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended by Public Law 104-168.

(b) As revised by Treasury Decision 8932, January 10, 2001, regulations of the Secretary of the Treasury under the
 authority of Section 7502(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to prima facie evidence of delivery and postmark date for electronic filing) shall be applicable for prima facie evidence of delivery and the postmark date for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), this part, or Section 11003 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 543, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

21028.

(a) (1) With respect to tax advice, the protections of confidentiality that apply to a communication between a client and an attorney, as set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 950) of Chapter 4 of Division 8 of the Evidence Code, also shall apply to a communication between a taxpayer and any federally authorized tax practitioner to the extent the communication would be considered a privileged communication if it were between a client
 and an attorney. A federally authorized tax practitioner has the legal obligation and duty to maintain confidentiality with respect to such communication.

(2) Paragraph (1) may only be asserted in any noncriminal tax matter before the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) For purposes of this section:

(A) “Federally authorized tax practitioner” means any individual who is authorized under federal law to practice before the Internal Revenue Service if the practice is subject to federal regulation under Section 330 of Title 31 of the United States Code, as provided by federal law as of January 1, 2000.

(B) “Tax advice” means advice given by an individual with respect to a state tax matter, which may include federal tax advice if it relates to the state tax matter. For
 purposes of this subparagraph, “federal tax advice” means advice given by an individual within the scope of his or her authority to practice before the federal Internal Revenue Service on noncriminal tax matters.

(C) “Tax shelter” means a partnership or other entity, any investment plan or arrangement, or any other plan or arrangement if a significant purpose of that partnership, entity, plan, or arrangement is the avoidance or evasion of federal income tax or the avoidance or evasion of the tax imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(b) The privilege under subdivision (a) does not apply to any written communication between a federally authorized tax practitioner and any person, or any director, officer, employee, agent, or representative of the person, or any other person holding a capital or profits interest in the
 person in connection with the promotion of the direct or indirect participation of the person in any tax shelter (as defined in Section 6662(d)(2)(C)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code as modified by substituting the phrase “income or franchise tax” for “Federal income tax”), or in any proceeding to revoke or otherwise discipline any license or right to practice by any governmental agency.

(c) This section shall be operative for communications made on or after the effective date of the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 411, Sec. 2.   (AB 129)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10.8. Taxation of Anti-Weaponization Fund Payments Act [22000. - 22000.]

22000.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2030, there shall be imposed on a taxpayer, a tax equal to 100 percent of any settlement fund payment received by the taxpayer during the taxable year. 

(b) (1) For purposes of this part, the following definitions shall apply:

(A) “Member of the family” means the following:

(i) The spouse of an individual.

(ii) An individual who bears a relationship to an individual which is described in subparagraphs (A) to (G) of
 Section 152(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to relationship.

(B) “Settlement fund payment” means any payment, distribution, or monetary transfer received by a taxpayer during the taxable year, from either of the following:

(i) The Anti-Weaponization Fund established by the Department of Justice in relation to President Donald J. Trump v. Internal Revenue Service, Case No. 1:26-cv-20609 (S.D. Fla. 2026), or any subsequent fund, settlement, or agreement.

(ii) Any fund, trust, or account, the assets of which are derived from the outcome, whether by settlement, verdict, or otherwise, of any civil action that was filed by a specified person, who is not the taxpayer, against the United States, or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or against any state and its political subdivisions.

(C) “Specified person” means any of the following:

(i) An individual who served, or is currently serving, as President of the United States. 

(ii) A member of the family of an individual who served, or is currently serving, as President of the United States.

(iii) A person controlled, based on principles specified in Section 52(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, by one or more individuals described in clause (i) or (ii).

(D) “Taxpayer” has the same meaning as Sections 17004 and 23037.

(2) Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this part and those in Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2
 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply to this part.

(c) Any specified settlement fund payment that is taxed under subdivision (a) shall be excluded from the gross income under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) for the taxable year that the specified settlement fund payment is subject to tax.

(d) The tax imposed under subdivision (a) shall not be reduced by any deduction or credit allowed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). 

(e) The tax imposed under subdivision (a) shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other tax or fee that is due and payable under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or Part 11 (commencing
 with Section 23001), and shall not change any filing requirements for those taxes and fees.

(f) (1) The tax imposed by this part shall be due and payable on or before the due date of the original return that the taxpayer is required to file pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) without regard to any extension of time for filing the return for the taxable year of the imposition of tax imposed under subdivision (a).

(2) All taxes paid pursuant to this section shall be made in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The tax imposed under this part shall be assessed and collected pursuant to Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), except Articles 6 (commencing with Section 19101) and 7 (commencing with Section 19131) of Chapter 4 of Part 10.2 shall not
 apply.

(g) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may adopt regulations that are necessary or appropriate to implement this part.

(2) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall not apply to any regulation, rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this part.

(h) This part shall remain in effect until December 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 29.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Part 10.8, commencing with Section 22000.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. CORPORATION TAX LAW [23001. - 25141.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [23001. - 23060.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [23001. - 23004.]

23001.

This part is known and may be cited as the Corporation Tax Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 543, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

23002.

Except where otherwise expressly provided, all of the provisions of this part are applicable to the taxes imposed respectively under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101), Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 23400), or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501), or to the predecessor acts of this part, the Bank and Corporation Franchise Tax Act or the Corporation Income Tax Act, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 31.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

23003.

A reference made in this part by number without further identification:

(a) To a division, is a reference to that division of this code.

(b) To a part, is a reference to that part in this division.

(c) To a chapter, is a reference to that chapter in which it is made.

(d) To an article, is a reference to that article in the chapter in which it is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

23004.

Whenever this part refers to “regulations of the Franchise Tax Board,” or makes similar reference, the reference authorizes the Franchise Tax Board to make rules and regulations as to the subject matter concerning which the reference is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [23030. - 23060.]

23030.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions given in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

23031.

“Franchise Tax Board” means the Franchise Tax Board described in Part 10 (commencing with Section 15700) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

“Board” means the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

23032.

“Fiscal year” means an accounting period of twelve months or less ending on the last day of any month other than December.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

23033.

“Paid or incurred” and “paid or accrued” shall be construed according to the method of accounting upon the basis of which net income is computed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

23034.

“State” includes the District of Columbia, and the possessions of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 485.)
-------------------------------------------

23035.

“Counsel for the Franchise Tax Board” means attorney or attorneys appointed or employed by the Franchise Tax Board and acting subject to the approval and under the supervision of the Attorney General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.

(a) (1) The term “tax” includes any of the following:

(A) The tax imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101).

(B) The tax imposed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501).

(C) The tax on unrelated business taxable income, imposed under Section 23731.

(D) The tax on “S” corporations imposed under Section 23802.

(2) The term “tax” does not include any amount imposed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 24667 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section
 24667.

(b) For purposes of Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2, Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of Chapter 4, Article 6 (commencing with Section 19101) of Chapter 4, and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 19501) of Part 10.2, and, for purposes of Sections 18601, 19001, and 19005, the term “tax” also includes all of the following:

(1) The tax on limited partnerships, imposed under Section 17935, the tax on limited liability companies, imposed under Section 17941, and the tax on registered limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability partnerships imposed under Section 17948.

(2) The
 alternative minimum tax imposed under Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 23400).

(3) The tax on built-in gains of “S” corporations, imposed under Section 23809.

(4) The tax on excess passive investment income of “S” corporations, imposed under Section 23811.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, credits are allowed against the “tax” in the following order:

(1) Credits that do not contain carryover provisions.

(2) Credits that, when the credit exceeds the “tax,” allow the excess to be carried over to offset the “tax” in succeeding taxable years, except for those credits that are allowed to reduce the “tax” below the tentative minimum tax, as defined by Section 23455. The
 order of credits within this paragraph shall be determined by the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) The minimum tax credit allowed by Section 23453.

(4) Credits that are allowed to reduce the “tax” below the tentative minimum tax, as defined by Section 23455, except the credit described in paragraph (5).

(5) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the credit allowed by Section 23698.1.

(6) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the credit allowed by Section 23036.5.

(7) Credits for taxes withheld under Section 18662.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, each of the following
 applies:

(1) A credit may not reduce the “tax” below the tentative minimum tax (as defined by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 23455), except the following credits:

(A) The credit allowed by former Section 23601 (relating to solar energy).

(B) The credit allowed by former Section 23601.4 (relating to solar energy).

(C) The credit allowed by former Section 23601.5 (relating to solar energy).

(D) The credit allowed by Section 23609 (relating to research expenditures).

(E) The credit allowed by former Section 23609.5 (relating to clinical testing expenses).

(F) The credit allowed by Section 23610.5 (relating to low-income housing).

(G) The credit allowed by former Section 23612 (relating to sales and use tax credit).

(H) The credit allowed by Section 23612.2 (relating to enterprise zone sales or use tax credit).

(I) The credit allowed by former Section 23612.6 (relating to Los Angeles Revitalization Zone sales tax credit).

(J) The credit allowed by former Section 23622 (relating to enterprise zone hiring credit).

(K) The credit allowed by Section 23622.7 (relating to enterprise zone hiring credit).

(L) The credit allowed by former Section 23623 (relating to program
 area hiring credit).

(M) The credit allowed by former Section 23623.5 (relating to Los Angeles Revitalization Zone hiring credit).

(N) The credit allowed by former Section 23625 (relating to Los Angeles Revitalization Zone hiring credit).

(O) The credit allowed by Section 23633 (relating to targeted tax area sales or use tax credit).

(P) The credit allowed by Section 23634 (relating to targeted tax area hiring credit).

(Q) The credit allowed by former Section 23649 (relating to qualified property).

(R) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, the credit allowed by Section 23685 (relating to qualified motion
 pictures).

(S) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, the credit allowed by Section 23689 (relating to GO-Biz California Competes Credit).

(T) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016, the credit allowed by Section 23695 (relating to qualified motion pictures).

(U) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, the credit allowed by Section 23686 (relating to the College Access Tax Credit Fund).

(V) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2017, the credit allowed by Section 23687 (relating to the College Access Tax Credit Fund).

(W) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2031, the credit allowed
 by Section 23636 (relating to the new advanced strategic aircraft credit).

(X) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, the credit allowed by Section 23698 (relating to the California Motion Picture and Television Production Credit).

(Y) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the credit allowed by Section 23698.1 (relating to the California Motion Picture and Television Production Credit).

(Z) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, the credit allowed by Section 23036.5.

(AA) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2036, the credit allowed by Section 23640 (relating to eligible
 transmission projects).

(2) A credit against the tax may not reduce the minimum franchise tax imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101).

(e) Any credit which is partially or totally denied under subdivision (d) is allowed to be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, if the provisions relating to that credit include a provision to allow a carryover of the unused portion of that credit.

(f) Unless otherwise provided, any remaining carryover from a credit that has been repealed or made inoperative is allowed to be carried over under the provisions of that section as it read immediately prior to being repealed or becoming inoperative.

(g) Unless otherwise provided, if
 two or more taxpayers share in costs that would be eligible for a tax credit allowed under this part, each taxpayer is eligible to receive the tax credit in proportion to their respective share of the costs paid or incurred.

(h) Unless otherwise provided, in the case of an “S” corporation, any credit allowed by this part is computed at the “S” corporation level, and any limitation on the expenses qualifying for the credit or limitation upon the amount of the credit applies to the “S” corporation and to each shareholder.

(i) (1) With respect to any taxpayer that directly or indirectly owns an interest in a business entity that is disregarded for tax purposes pursuant to Section 23038 and any regulations thereunder, the amount of any credit or credit carryforward allowable for any taxable year attributable to the disregarded business entity is limited in
 accordance with paragraphs (2) and (3).

(2) The amount of any credit otherwise allowed under this part, including any credit carryover from prior years, that may be applied to reduce the taxpayer’s “tax,” as defined in subdivision (a), for the taxable year is limited to an amount equal to the excess of the taxpayer’s regular tax (as defined in Section 23455), determined by including income attributable to the disregarded business entity that generated the credit or credit carryover, over the taxpayer’s regular tax (as defined in Section 23455), determined by excluding the income attributable to that disregarded business entity. A credit is not allowed if the taxpayer’s regular tax (as defined in Section 23455), determined by including the income attributable to the disregarded business entity is less than the taxpayer’s regular tax (as defined in Section 23455), determined by excluding the income attributable to the disregarded business
 entity.

(3) If the amount of a credit allowed pursuant to the section establishing the credit exceeds the amount allowable under this subdivision in any taxable year, the excess amount may be carried over to subsequent taxable years pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f).

(j) (1) Unless otherwise specifically provided, in the case of a taxpayer that is a partner or shareholder of an eligible pass-thru entity described in paragraph (2), any credit passed through to the taxpayer in the taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning on or after the date the credit is no longer operative may be claimed by the taxpayer in that taxable year, notwithstanding the repeal of the statute authorizing the credit prior to the close of that taxable year.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “eligible pass-thru
 entity” means any partnership or “S” corporation that files its return on a fiscal year basis pursuant to Section 18566, and that is entitled to a credit pursuant to this part for the taxable year that begins during the last year a credit is operative.

(3) This subdivision applies to credits that become inoperative on or after the operative date of the act adding this subdivision.

(k) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 56 of the Statutes of 2023 shall apply as follows:

(1) The amendments to subdivision (c) shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

(2) The amendments to subparagraph (X) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020.

(3) The amendments to subparagraph (Y) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 65.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.1.

Notwithstanding Section 23036 or any other provision in this part to the contrary, the credit allowed by Section 23630 (relating to natural heritage) may reduce the “tax” below the tentative minimum tax, as defined by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 23455, but only after allowance of the credit allowed by Section 23453.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 113, Sec. 4.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2008, and before January 1, 2010, the total of all credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 23604) including the carryover of any credit under a former provision of that chapter, for the taxable year shall not reduce the “tax” (as defined in Section 23036) below the applicable amount.

(b) This section shall not apply to the credit allowed by Section 23623 (relating to full time employment hiring credit).

(c) For purposes of this section, the “applicable amount” shall be equal to 50 percent of the “tax” (as defined in Section 23036) before application of any credits.

(d) The amount of any credit otherwise allowable for the taxable year under Section 23036 that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall remain a credit carryover amount under this part.

(e) The carryover period for any credit that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall be increased by the number of taxable years the credit (or any portion thereof) was not allowed.

(f) The
 provisions of this section shall not apply to a taxpayer with income subject to tax under this part of less than $500,000 for the taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 17, Sec. 6.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, except as provided in subdivision (d), for taxpayers not required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers not authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022, the total of all credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 23604) including the carryover of any credit under a former provision of that chapter, for the taxable year shall not reduce the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, by more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of
 this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, except as provided in subdivision (d), for taxpayers required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2020, and before January 1, 2022, the total of all credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 23604), including the carryover of any credit under a former provision of that chapter, by all members of the combined report shall not reduce the aggregate amount of “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, of all members of the combined report by more than five-million-dollars ($5,000,000).

(c) Any amounts included in an election pursuant to Section 6902.5, relating to an irrevocable election to apply credit amounts under Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 23685, 23695, or
 23698 against qualified sales and use tax, as defined in Section 6902.5, are not included in the five million dollar ($5,000,000) limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) The limitation under subdivision (a) or (b) shall not apply to the credit allowed by Section 23610.5 (relating to credit for low-income housing).

(e) The amount of any credit otherwise allowable for the taxable year under Section 23036 that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall remain a credit carryover amount under this part.

(f) The carryover period for any credit that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall be increased by the number of taxable years the credit or any portion thereof was not allowed.

(g) Chapter 3.5 (commencing
 with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 3, Sec. 16.   (SB 113)   Effective February 9, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, except as provided in subdivision (d), for taxpayers not required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers not authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030, the total of all credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 23604), including the carryover of any credit under a former provision of that chapter, for the taxable year shall not reduce the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, by more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(b) Notwithstanding any provision
 of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, except as provided in subdivision (d), for taxpayers required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030, the total of all credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 23604), including the carryover of any credit under a former provision of that chapter, by all members of the combined report shall not reduce the aggregate amount of “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, of all members of the combined report by more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(c) Any amounts included in an election pursuant to Section 6902.5, relating to an irrevocable election to apply credit amounts under Section 17053.85, 17053.95, 17053.98, 17053.98.1,
 23685, 23695, 23698, or 23698.1 against qualified sales and use tax, as defined in Section 6902.5, are not included in the five million dollar ($5,000,000) limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) The limitation under subdivision (a) or (b) shall not apply to the credit allowed by Section 23610.5 (relating to credit for low-income housing).

(e) Any annual refundable credit amount included in an election pursuant to Section 23036.5 is not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(f) Notwithstanding the operative date in subdivision (a), for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, if an election is made pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 23698.1, both the credit allowed against the “tax” under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of
 Section 23698.1 and the annual refundable amount calculated under subdivision (k) of Section 23698.1 shall not be included in the limitation set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(g) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, any credit, or portion thereof, sold pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17053.95, 17053.98, or 17053.98.1, paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 23695 or 23698, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 23698.1, is not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(h) The amount of any credit otherwise allowable for the taxable year under Section 23036 that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall remain a credit carryover amount under this part.

(i) The carryover period for any credit that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall be increased by the number of taxable years the credit or any portion thereof was not allowed.

(j) For taxpayers that make the election under subdivision (k) of Section 23698.1, any amount of refundable credits pursuant to that subdivision over the five-million-dollar ($5,000,000) limitation under this section shall be allowed in the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2027.

(k) If a taxpayer makes the election under both Section 23036.5 and subdivision (k) of Section 23698.1 with respect to the credit amount under Section 23698.1, the total amount of credit allowed pursuant to both elections shall not exceed the credit amount allowed under subdivision (a) of Section 23698.1.

 (l) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(m) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall be operative for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 344, Sec. 6.   (SB 186)   Effective September 19, 2026.   Operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.5.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030, a taxpayer may make an election to receive an annual refundable credit amount of qualified credits for each taxable year to be allowed pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) In each taxable year of the refundable period, the annual refundable credit amount shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax” computed under this part for the taxable year, and the excess, if any, shall be credited against other amounts due, if any, and the balance, if any, shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account to the taxpayer.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Annual refundable credit amount” means 20 percent of the
 credit amount for the taxable year.

(2) (A) “Credit amount” means the amount of the qualified credits that would have otherwise been available to reduce net tax in the taxable year of the election but for the limitation under Section 23036.4.

(B) In the case of a pass-thru entity, the “credit amount” refers to the pro rata share or distributive share of the credit passed through to the partner or shareholder of the qualified taxpayer. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term “pass-thru entity” means any partnership, “S” corporation, or limited liability company treated as a partnership.

(C) In the case of an assigned credit, the “credit amount” refers to the credit amount that was assigned to the taxpayer.

(D) In the case of
 taxpayers required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, the “credit amount” refers to the credit amount of all members of the combined report.

(3) “Qualified credits” means the credits subject to the limitation under Section 23036.4.

(4) “Refundable period” means the first five consecutive taxable years beginning the third taxable year after the taxable year that the taxpayer makes an election under this section.

(c) No portion of the annual refundable credit amount can be assigned to another taxpayer.

(d) The following shall apply for purposes of the election pursuant to this section:

(1) The taxpayer may make an election for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2030.

(2) Each election shall be irrevocable and shall be made on an original, timely filed return required under Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) for the taxable year that the election is made in the form and manner as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) (1) Any adjustment of an annual refundable credit amount shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. This includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) A valid election as required under this section was not made.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board determines that credit
 amount overstatements in any taxable year resulted in an overstatement in any carryover amount or an overstatement of any refundable credit amount.

(C) The Franchise Tax Board determines that the credit amount was overstated as a result of any subsequent adjustment in the amount of net tax, including, but not limited to, an audit adjustment or claim for refund.

(2) Any amount of tax due resulting from such disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided by Section 19051.

(f) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2037, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 31.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2037, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23036.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, except as provided in subdivision (d), for taxpayers not required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers not authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2030, the total of all credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 23608), including the carryover of any credit under a former provision of that chapter, for the taxable year shall not reduce the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, by more than 70 percent or five million dollars ($5,000,000), whichever is greater.

(b) Notwithstanding any
 provision of this part or Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) to the contrary, except as provided in subdivision (d), for taxpayers required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or 25110, or taxpayers authorized to be included in a combined report under Section 25101.15, for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2030, the total of all credits otherwise allowable under any provision of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 23608), including the carryover of any credit under a former provision of that chapter, by all members of the combined report shall not reduce the aggregate amount of “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, of all members of the combined report by more than 70 percent or five million dollars ($5,000,000), whichever is greater.

(c) Any amounts included in an election pursuant to Section 6902.5, relating to an irrevocable election to apply credit amounts under Section 17053.85, 17053.95,
 17053.98, 17053.98.1, 23685, 23695, 23698, or 23698.1 against qualified sales and use tax, as defined in Section 6902.5, are not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) The limitation under subdivision (a) or (b) shall not apply to the credit allowed by Section 23610.5 (relating to credit for low-income housing).

(e) Any annual refundable credit amount included in an election pursuant to Section 23036.5 is not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(f) If an election is made pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 23698.1, both the credit allowed against the “tax” under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (k) of Section 23698.1 and the annual refundable amount calculated under subdivision (k) of Section 23698.1 shall not be included in the
 limitation set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section.

(g) Any credit, or portion thereof, sold pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 17053.95, 17053.98, or 17053.98.1, paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 23695 or 23698, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 23698.1, is not included in the limitation set forth in subdivision (a) or (b).

(h) The amount of any credit otherwise allowable for the taxable year under Section 23036 that is not allowed due to the application of this section shall remain a credit carryover amount under this part.

(i) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 344, Sec. 7.   (SB 186)   Effective September 19, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23037.
